California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Applied behavioral analysis” means the design, implementation, and evaluation of systematic instructional and environmental modifications to promote positive social behaviors and reduce or ameliorate behaviors that interfere with learning and social interaction.

(2) “Intensive behavioral intervention” means any form of applied behavioral analysis that is comprehensive, designed to address all domains of functioning, and provided in multiple settings for no
 more than 40 hours per week, across all settings, depending on the individual’s needs and progress. Interventions can be delivered in a one-to-one ratio or small group format, as appropriate.

(3) “Evidence-based practice” means a decisionmaking process that integrates the best available scientifically rigorous research, clinical expertise, and individual’s characteristics. Evidence-based practice is an approach to treatment rather than a specific treatment. Evidence-based practice promotes the collection, interpretation, integration, and continuous evaluation of valid, important, and applicable individual- or family-reported, clinically observed, and research-supported evidence. The best available evidence, matched to consumer circumstances and preferences, is applied to ensure the quality of clinical judgments and facilitates the most cost-effective
 care.

(4) “Parent participation” may include, but shall not be limited to, the following meanings:

(A) Completion of group instruction on the basics of behavior intervention.

(B) Implementation of intervention strategies, according to the intervention plan.

(C) If needed, collection of data on behavioral strategies and submission of that data to the provider for incorporation into progress reports.

(D) Participation in any needed clinical meetings.

(E) Purchase of suggested behavior modification materials or community involvement if a
 reward system is used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 132.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4686.3.

The department shall adopt emergency regulations to address the use of paraprofessionals in group practice provider behavioral intervention services and establish a rate. The regulations shall also establish a rate and the educational or experiential qualifications and professional supervision requirements necessary for the paraprofessional to provide behavioral intervention services. The adoption, amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this section is deemed to be
 necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe specific facts showing the need for immediate action. A certificate of compliance for these implementing regulations shall be filed within 24 months following the adoption of the first emergency regulations filed pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 37, Sec. 15.   (AB 104)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4686.31.

(a) Effective July 1, 2011, notwithstanding any other law or regulation to the contrary, any vendor who provides services as specified in paragraph (4) shall submit verification to the regional center for services provided to consumers who are under 18 years of age and residing in the family home as follows:

(1) The department shall develop and post a standard form for vendors to complete and provide
 to the family for signature. The form shall include, but not be limited to, the name and title of the vendor, the vendor identification number, the name of the consumer, the unique client identifier, the location of the service, the date and start and end times of the service, and a description of the service provided. The form shall also include instructions for the parents or legally appointed guardians to contact the regional center service coordinator immediately if they are unable to sign the form.

(2) The vendor shall provide the parents or legally appointed guardians of a minor consumer with the department form to sign. The form shall be signed and dated by the parents or legally appointed guardians of a minor consumer and be submitted to the vendor providing services within 30 days of the month in which the services were provided.

(3) The vendor shall submit the completed
 forms to the regional center together with the vendor’s invoices for the services provided.

(4) If the parents or legally appointed guardians of a minor consumer do not submit a form to the vendor, the vendor shall notify the regional center.

(5) This subdivision shall only apply to the following types of services: Behavior Analyst, Associate Behavior Analyst, Behavior Management Assistant, Behavior Technician (Paraprofessional), Behavior Management Consultant, Counseling Services, Tutor, Crisis Team-Evaluation and Behavioral Intervention, Tutor Services-Group, Client/Parent Support Behavior Intervention Training, and Parent-Coordinated Home Based Behavior Intervention Program for Autistic Children.

(b) The failure of the parents or legally appointed guardians of a minor consumer to submit a verification of services
 to the vendor shall not be a basis for terminating or changing behavioral services to the minor consumer. Any changes to behavioral services shall be made by the consumer’s planning team pursuant to Section 4512.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 37, Sec. 16.   (AB 104)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4686.4.

(a) On or before July 1, 2026, the department shall adopt regulations to address the use of Behavioral Health Professionals in behavioral health treatment group practice.
 The regulations shall also establish a rate and the educational or experiential qualifications and professional supervision requirements necessary for the Behavioral Health Professional to provide evidence-based behavioral intervention services.

(b) On or before July 1, 2026, the department shall adopt regulations to address the use of Behavioral Health Paraprofessionals in behavioral health treatment group practice. The regulations shall also establish a rate and the educational or experiential qualifications and professional supervision requirements
 necessary for the
 Behavioral Health Paraprofessional to provide evidence-based behavioral intervention services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 635, Sec. 3.   (SB 805)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4687.

Consistent with state and federal law, the Legislature recognizes the rights of persons with disabilities to have relationships, marry, be a part of a family, and to parent if they so choose. The Legislature further recognizes that individuals with developmental disabilities may need support and counseling in order to make informed decisions in these areas. In order to achieve these goals, the following services may be made available to persons with developmental disabilities:

(a) Sexuality
 training.

(b) Parenting skills training.

(c) Supported living arrangements for parents with developmental disabilities and their children.

(d) Advocacy assistance to deal with agencies, including, but not limited to, child protective services, and assistance in reunification planning.

(e) Family counseling services.

(f) Other services and supports listed in Section 4685 when needed to maintain and strengthen the family unit, where one or both of the parents is an individual with developmental disabilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1011, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4688.

(a) Consistent with state and federal law, the Legislature places a high priority on providing opportunities for individuals with developmental disabilities to be integrated into the mainstream life of their natural communities. In order to ensure that opportunities for integration are maximized, the procedure described in subdivision (b) shall be adopted.

(b) Regional centers shall be responsible for expanding opportunities for the full and equal participation of persons with
 developmental disabilities in their local communities through, activities, that may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(1) Outreach to, and training and education of, representatives of community service agencies and programs, businesses, and community activity providers regarding the provision and expansion of opportunities for participation by regional center consumers.

(2) Developing a community resources list.

(3) Providing assistance to case managers and family members on expanding community integration options for consumers in the areas of work, recreation, social, community service, education, and public services.

(4) Developing and facilitating the use of innovative methods of contracting with community members to provide
 support in natural environments to regional center consumers.

(5) Development and facilitating the use of natural supports to enhance community participation.

(6) Providing technical assistance to, and coordinating with, community support facilitators who will be used to provide supports to individual consumers for community participation, as needed.

(7) Providing sources of information relevant to individuals in making informed choices about employment options. This information may include, but need not be limited to, work incentive programs for persons with developmental disabilities, access and retention of needed benefits, interactions of earned income, asset building, or other financial changes on benefits, employment programs and protections, taxpayer requirements and responsibilities, training opportunities,
 and information and services available through other agencies, organizations, or on the Internet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 397, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4688.05.

Regional centers shall provide independent living skills services to an adult consumer, consistent with his or her individual program plan, that provide the consumer with functional skills training that enables him or her to acquire or maintain skills to live independently in his or her own home, or to achieve greater independence while living in the home of a parent, family member, or other person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 402, Sec. 3.   (SB 1093)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4688.06.

(a) Consistent with state and federal law, the Legislature recognizes the right of adults with disabilities to reside in the family home. The Legislature further recognizes that adults with developmental disabilities, and their families, may need coordinated family support services that are tailored to the unique needs of the consumer and that are respectful of the language, ethnicity, and culture of the family home.

(b) The department shall establish a Coordinated Family Support Services Pilot Program for adults who live with their families. The pilot program may focus on improving equitable access to services and supports and reducing ethnic and racial disparities in purchases of services.

(c) The services provided by the Coordinated Family Support Services Pilot Program shall be flexible and tailored to assist the consumer to remain in the home of their family for as long as that remains the preferred living option for the consumer and their family.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may issue administrative program directives to ensure compliance with this section until the time regulations are adopted. It is the intent of the Legislature that the department be allowed this temporary authority as necessary to implement program changes only until completion of the regulatory process.

(2) Any regulation or administrative program directive issued pursuant to this subdivision shall include key elements of the Coordinated Family
 Support Services Program, including eligibility criteria, service design, and standards for vendors.

(3) The department shall collaborate with stakeholders to obtain input about key elements prior to the issuance of regulations or administrative program directives. Stakeholders shall include, but not be limited to, consumers and family members, including those from ethnically and racially diverse backgrounds, regional centers, the protection and advocacy agency described in subdivision (i) of Section 4900, the Office of Clients’ Rights as described in Section 4433, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, providers who deliver supported living services described in Section 4689, and providers with experience delivering services to adults living in the home of a parent or a family member, including independent living skills services described in Section 4688.05.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 24.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4688.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary, vendors of behavior management, activity center, and adult development center day programs, social recreation programs, socialization training programs, community integration training programs, community activities support programs, creative art programs, and work activity programs shall offer an alternative senior program
 component focused on the needs of individuals with developmental disabilities who are over 50 years of age, at a rate not to exceed the lesser of thirty-five dollars ($35) per day or the vendor’s existing daily rate.

(1) The alternative senior program component shall be provided at a ratio of no more than eight consumers to one staff member.

(2) Consistent with the intent of the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act, the alternative senior program component shall be offered within the provider’s existing vendored capacity as reflected in its program design or licensed capacity.

(b) Effective July 1, 2009, at the time of development, review, or modification of an eligible consumer’s individual program plan, regional centers, as appropriate, shall provide information about and offer an alternative senior
 program. The alternative senior program shall be offered to eligible consumers who want to transition to a program component focused on the needs and interests of seniors.

(c) Effective July 1, 2011, a regional center shall not refer any additional consumers to alternative senior programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 37, Sec. 17.   (AB 104)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4688.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary, vendors of behavior management, activity center, and adult development center adult day programs, community integration training programs, and community activities support services programs shall offer an alternative customized program component with an appropriate staffing component to meet individualized consumer needs.

(1) The alternative customized program component shall be offered within the provider’s existing vendored capacity, as reflected in its program design or licensed capacity.

(2) The regional center shall fund customized programs based on the vendor’s existing rate and only fund those hours provided.

(b) Effective July 1, 2009, at the time of development, review, or modification of a consumer’s individual program plan, regional centers, as appropriate, shall provide information about and make available the customized program option.

(1) The alternative customized program component shall be offered to individuals with developmental disabilities who want a program focused on their individualized needs and interests to develop or maintain employment or
 volunteer activities in lieu of their current program.

(2) Total hours of service for this alternative customized program shall range between 20 and 80 hours per month, per person, depending on the support needs of the individual.

(c) Effective July 1, 2011, a regional center shall not refer any additional consumers to alternative customized programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 37, Sec. 18.   (AB 104)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4688.21.

(a) The Legislature places a high priority on opportunities for adults with developmental disabilities to choose and customize day services to meet their individualized needs; have opportunities to further the development and support of employment and volunteer activities; direct their services; pursue postsecondary education; establish and support paid internship program opportunities; and increase their ability to lead integrated and inclusive lives. To further these goals, a consumer may choose a tailored day service or vouchered community-based training service, in lieu of, or in conjunction with, any other regional center vendored day program, look-alike day program, supported employment program, or work activity program.

(b) (1) A
 tailored day service shall include an individualized service design, as determined through the individual program plan (IPP), and developed through a person-centered planning process that reflects and maximizes individual preferences and goals, and approved by the regional center. This service design may include, but may not be limited to, the following:

(A) Fewer days or hours than in the program’s approved day program, look-alike day program, supported employment program, or work activity program design.

(B) Flexibility in the duration, location, including by remote electronic communications, and intensity of services to meet the consumer’s individualized needs.

(C) Prioritize the development or support of competitive, integrated employment, volunteer activities, or pursuit of postsecondary education; establish and
 support paid internship program opportunities; maximize consumer direction of the service; and increase the consumer’s ability to lead an integrated and inclusive life.

(2) The type and amount of tailored day service shall be determined through the IPP process, pursuant to Section 4646. The IPP shall contain, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) A detailed description of the consumer’s individualized choices and needs and how these choices and needs will be met.

(B) The type and amount of services and staffing needed to meet the consumer’s individualized choices and needs, and unique health and safety and other needs.

(3) The staffing requirements set forth in Section 55756 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations and subdivision (p) of
 Section 4851 of this code shall not apply to a tailored day service.

(4) Commencing July 1, 2022, until June 30, 2025, inclusive, for vendored programs wishing to offer a tailored day service option, the hourly rate for the tailored day service option shall be calculated using a base rate, defined as twice the amount of the rate model or models for “Community-Based Day, Community Only, 1:2.” The calculation of the rate shall be as follows:

(A) Effective July 1, 2022, the hourly rate shall equal 80 percent of the base rate.

(B) The rate established in subparagraph (A) shall remain in effect pending the department’s review, in coordination with stakeholders, of implementation of this section, as amended by the act that added this paragraph. The review, to be completed by June 30, 2024, shall include development of
 recommendations that may include, but not be limited to, modifying the scope of the service or establishing a rate model specific to the service. The department shall provide an update to the Legislature on the status of the review no later than January 10, 2024.

(5) Commencing on July 1, 2025, for vendored programs wishing to offer a tailored day service option, the hourly rate for the tailored day service option shall be set by the department and posted on its internet website.

(6) The hold harmless policy defined in subdivision (d) of Section 4519.10 shall apply for vendored programs offering a tailored day service as of June 30, 2022, with an hourly rate that exceeds the rate calculated pursuant to this subdivision.

(7) Tailored day services shall not be delivered on the same day as any other regional center
 vendored day program, look-alike day program, or work activity program unless all of the following apply:

(A) A consumer has a plan identified in their individual program plan for transitioning from a work activity program to competitive integrated employment, paid internship, or postsecondary education.

(B) The transition plan is developed through a person-centered planning process that reflects and maximizes individual preferences and goals.

(C) The duration of the delivery of tailored day services on the same day or days as a work activity program is no longer than six months.

(8) Tailored day services may be delivered on the same day as supported employment individual placement services.

(9) The total monthly hours of tailored day services shall not exceed the number of days in the month tailored day services are authorized, multiplied by four.

(10) The regional center shall ensure that the vendor is capable of complying with, and will comply with, the consumer’s IPP, individual choice, and health and safety needs.

(11) Effective July 1, 2011, and prior to the time of development, review, or modification of a consumer’s IPP, regional centers shall provide information about tailored day service to eligible adult consumers. A consumer may request information about tailored day services from the regional center at any time and may request an IPP meeting to secure those services.

(c) (1) A vouchered community-based
 training service is defined as a consumer-directed service that assists the consumer in the development of skills required for competitive integrated employment, the paid internship program, participation in volunteer activities, or any combination of these, and the assistance necessary for the consumer to secure employment, a paid internship, or volunteer positions or pursue secondary education.

(2) Implementation of vouchered community-based training service is contingent upon the approval of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(3) Vouchered community-based training service shall be provided in natural environments in the community, separate from the consumer’s residence.

(4) A consumer, parent, or conservator vendored as a vouchered community-based training service shall utilize the services of
 a financial management services (FMS) entity. The regional center shall provide information about available financial management services and shall assist the consumer in selecting a FMS vendor to act as coemployer.

(5) A parent or conservator shall not be the direct support worker employed by the vouchered community-based training service vendor.

(6) If the direct support worker is required to transport the consumer, the vouchered community-based training service vendor shall verify that the direct support worker can transport the consumer safely and has a valid California driver’s license and proof of insurance.

(7) The rate for vouchered community-based training service shall be the most recent rate posted on the department’s public internet website. The rate includes employer-related taxes and all transportation
 needed to implement the service, except as described in paragraph (8). The rate does not include the cost of the FMS.

(8) A consumer vendored as a vouchered community-based training service shall also be eligible for a regional center-funded bus pass, if appropriate and needed.

(9) Vouchered community-based training service shall be limited to a maximum of 150 hours per quarter. The services to be provided and the service hours shall be documented in the consumer’s IPP.

(10) A direct support worker of vouchered community-based training service shall be an adult who possesses the skill, training, and experience necessary to provide services in accordance with the IPP.

(11) Effective July 1, 2011, and prior to the time of development, review, or
 modification of a consumer’s IPP, regional centers shall provide information about vouchered community-based training service to eligible adult consumers.

(12) The type and amount of vouchered community-based training service shall be determined through the IPP process pursuant to Section 4646. The IPP shall contain, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) A detailed description of the consumer’s individualized choices and needs and how these choices and needs will be met.

(B) The type and amount of services and staffing needed to meet the consumer’s individualized choices and unique health and safety and other needs.

(d) The department may adopt emergency regulations for tailored day service or vouchered community-based training service. The
 adoption, amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this subdivision is deemed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe specific facts showing the need for immediate action. A certificate of compliance for these implementing regulations shall be filed within 24 months following the adoption of the first emergency regulations filed pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 37.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4688.22.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) The Legislature places a high priority on promoting the full inclusion and independence of individuals with developmental disabilities, including through opportunities for recreation, consistent with Section 4501 and paragraphs (6) and (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 4502.

(2) As such, it is the intent of the Legislature for social recreation services, camping services, and nonmedical therapies, including, but not limited to,
 specialized recreation, art, dance, and music, to be
 among the services and supports within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 4512 and be made widely available to consumers, not only for socialization, but to lead the lives that they want in the community. It is further the intent of the Legislature that regional centers, when developing purchase-of-service policies and related procedures, and that the department, when reviewing regional center purchase-of-service policies and related procedures, reduce administrative barriers to the utilization of these services by consumers to the fullest possible extent.

(b) The regional centers shall use the
 following principles when purchasing social recreation services, camping services, and nonmedical therapies:

(1) Consumers shall receive services and supports in settings that are typical of those in which persons without disabilities engage in social recreation, camping, or nonmedical therapies.

(2) The services described in this section shall promote community inclusion by providing opportunities to build ongoing relationships through or around shared interests or activities, and shall include both of the following:

(A) Activities that directly support a consumer’s ability to participate in typical social recreation or other community activities without paid support present.

(B) Activities that may identify or develop specific interests or skills,
 enable the consumer to engage with others around shared affinities or goals, or otherwise build informal social networks that reduce isolation, strengthen community ties, assist the consumer in advancing their own interests and well-being, and can be a source of voluntary natural supports.

(3) (A) Regional center purchase-of-service policies and related procedures shall promote access to the services described in this section for
 consumers who are children, for consumers who experience disparities in the receipt of regional center services,
 and for consumers or their representatives who are unable to afford paying for services upfront and awaiting reimbursement.

(B) Regional center purchase-of-service policies and procedures shall refer consumers and their families to existing opportunities for social recreation services and camping services by funding those services directly along with the supports they may need to access them.

(4) Regional center purchase-of-service policies and procedures related to services described in this section shall not do any of the following:

(A) Restrict funding of the services described in this section to only those that are specialized or directed toward the alleviation of a developmental disability within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 4512.

(B) Require the services described in this section to meet both a recreational and socialization need, or prohibit the purchase of
 one-on-one services, including private lessons.

(C) In order to further the legislative intent of making such services widely available to consumers, generally prohibit or disfavor purchase of these services.

(c) (1) The department shall prioritize and expedite any policies, procedures, or written directives that may be necessary to facilitate regional center efforts to increase access, collect data, or track expenditures pertaining to these services.

(2) (A) By October 1, 2024, regional
 centers shall designate one or more employees to serve as a point of contact for consumers, families, caregivers, and stakeholders regarding access to social recreation services, camping services, and nonmedical therapies, and any policies, procedures, or written directives related to these services. Regional centers shall provide the department with the names and contact information of these designees by October 1, 2024, and shall provide an updated list of designees semiannually thereafter.

(B) By January 1, 2025, regional centers shall adopt procedures aimed at increasing the availability of vendors and expediting vendorizations accordingly. These efforts shall include procedures that enable services described in this section, including, but not limited to, nonmedical therapies, to be funded directly through participant-directed services, consistent with directives or other guidance issued by the department pursuant to subdivision (e),
 without the need for consumers, family members, or other representatives to be reimbursed after paying for services or supports upfront. Furthermore, payments for these services shall be aligned with the typical processes used by local businesses or community resources.

(d) Effective July 1, 2023, a regional center shall not require a consumer or family member to do any of the following:

(1) Exhaust services under the In-Home Supportive Services program (Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9) in order for their regional center to consider
 funding or to authorize purchasing social recreation services, camping services, and nonmedical therapies, including, but not limited to, specialized recreation, art, dance, and music.

(2) Exchange respite hours or any other service or support authorized by the regional center for service hours of social recreation services, camping services, or nonmedical therapies, including, but not limited to, specialized recreation, art, dance, and music, as a condition of service authorization by the regional center of social recreation services, camping services, and nonmedical therapies.

(3) Pay a copayment, or a similar shared pay arrangement aimed at offsetting costs, in order to receive social recreation services, camping services, or nonmedical therapies, including, but not limited to, specialized recreation, art, dance, and music.

(e) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement the provision of social recreation services, camping services, and nonmedical therapies, including, but not limited to, specialized recreation, art, dance, and music, by means of written directives or similar instructions consistent with this section, including, but not limited to, the provision of those services as participant-directed services.

(f) (1) (A) By March 1, 2025, regional center staff, including supervisors, program managers,
 appeals hearing specialists, and employees who are involved in developing and implementing purchase-of-service policies, shall complete training about the services described in this section. The training curriculum shall include, at a minimum, statutes, directives, and policies related to social recreation services, camping services, and nonmedical therapies, including, but not limited to, the requirements and legislative intent of this section.

(B) By March 1, 2025, regional centers shall make any training curriculum or materials or other information utilized as part of the training described in subparagraph (A), along with the dates that training was provided to regional center staff, available on the corresponding regional center’s internet website.

(2) Training for appeals hearing officers, as required by subdivision (b) of Section 4712, shall include information about
 statutes, directives, and policies related to social recreation services, camping services, and nonmedical therapies, including, but not limited to, the requirements and legislative intent of this section.

(g) As part of its quarterly briefings to the Legislature pursuant to Section 4474.17, the department shall provide, at a minimum, all of the following information on the status of implementation of this section:

(1) The number, subject matter, and status or outcome of complaints, received by the Office of Community Operations or by the ombudsperson, related to consumer requests for social recreation, camp, or nonmedical therapies.

(2) The numbers and summaries of community concerns and issues obtained by the department pertaining to regional center purchase-of-service policies and procedures regarding the services
 and supports described in this section. These summaries shall be itemized by regional center and shall include the dates and sources of the concerns or issues.

(3) Trends in mediations, appeals, and hearing requests regarding the services and supports described in this section, including, but not limited to, trends related to the number of mediations and appeals by regional center, mediation outcomes, and nature of issues heard and decided on appeal.

(4) A summary of any technical assistance provided to regional centers or other department actions taken based on the information described in this subdivision for the purpose of ensuring and improving timely and equitable consumer access to services and supports pursuant to this section and consistent with legislative intent.

(5) All data reporting regarding the
 services described in this section, as required by paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 4519.5, including the total and per capita expenditure and authorization amounts by age, as applicable, according to race or ethnicity and preferred language, for all combined residence types and for consumers living in the family home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 47, Sec. 11.   (AB 162)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4688.3.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services and the department shall jointly seek a federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ (CMS) approved 1915(i) state plan amendment to expand federal financial participation for services to persons with developmental disabilities provided by regional centers pursuant to Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500).

(b) Services provided pursuant to this section shall be rendered under the administrative direction of the
 department. The department may issue program directives to regional centers for implementing the approved state plan amendment.

(c) If CMS approves the state plan amendment pursuant to Section 1915(i) of the Social Security Act, the Director of Health Care Services shall execute a declaration stating that this approval has been granted. The director shall retain the declaration and this section shall be implemented commencing on the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) The department may adopt regulations to implement this section and any sections in Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) necessary to implement the terms of the 1915(i) state plan amendment. The adoption, amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this section is deemed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and
 safety, or general welfare, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.9 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from that requirement. For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, the 120-day period, as applicable to the effective period of an emergency regulatory action and submission of specified materials to the Office of Administrative Law, is hereby extended to 180 days.

(e) The department shall adopt regulations to implement the terms of the 1915(i) state plan amendment though the regular rulemaking process pursuant to Sections 11346 and 11349.1 of the Government Code within 18 months of the adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to subdivision (d).

(f) The department shall consult with stakeholders, as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 4512.

(g) The
 State Department of Health Care Services shall post a copy of, or a link to, the approved state plan amendment and any State Department of Developmental Services regulations or program directives, or both, issued pursuant to this section on its Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 23.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4688.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the department may approve a proposal or proposals by Golden Gate Regional Center, Regional Center of the East Bay, and San Andreas Regional Center to provide for, secure, and assure the full payment of a lease or leases on housing, developed pursuant to this section, based on the availability for occupancy in each home, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The acquired or developed real property is
 available for occupancy by individuals eligible for regional center services and is integrated with housing for people without disabilities.

(2) The regional center has approved the proposed ownership entity, management entity, and developer or development entity for each project, and, prior to granting the approval, has consulted with the department and has provided to the department a proposal that includes the credentials of the proposed entities.

(3) The costs associated with the proposal are reasonable.

(4) The proposal includes a plan for a transfer at a time certain of the real property’s ownership to a nonprofit entity to be approved by the regional center.

(b) Prior to approving a regional center proposal pursuant to subdivision (a), the